src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
# Veps Noun inflection
* Metrical feet
	* Disyllables
		* pyrrhic, dibrach : kala
		* iamb	  	  : veneh
		* trochee, choree  : sanha sana+N+Sg+Ill
		* spondee	: landeh
	* Trisyllables
		* tribrach
		* dactyl
		* amphibrach
		* anapaest, antidactylus : venehed 
		* bacchius
		* antibacchius
		* cretic, amphimacer
		* molossus

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

nominative singular in form and the other is identical to the 
genitive singular. This definition is dependent on the school
and its use should be associated with the user group, perhaps.

* Noun 'berry / marja' - full paradigm: Noun - marj examples:*
* *marj:* `marj+N+Sg+Nom`
* *marjan:* `marj+N+Sg+Gen`
* *[marj,* `marjan]:` (Eng. marj+N+Sg+Acc)
* *marjad:* `marj+N+Sg+Par`
* *marjaks:* `marj+N+Sg+Tra`
* *marjata:* `marj+N+Sg+Abe`
* *marjanke:* `marj+N+Sg+Com`
* *marjas:* `marj+N+Sg+Ine`
* *marjaspäi:* `marj+N+Sg+Ela`
* *marjaha:* `marj+N+Sg+Ill`
* *marjal:* `marj+N+Sg+Ade`
* *marjalpäi:* `marj+N+Sg+Abl`
* *marjale:* `marj+N+Sg+All`
* *marjan:* `marj+N+Sg+EssInst`
* *marjadme:* `marj+N+Sg+Prl`
* *marjanno:* `marj+N+Sg+Apr1`
* *marjannoks:* `marj+N+Sg+Apr2`
* *marjannopäi:* `marj+N+Sg+Egr`
* *marjahosai:* `marj+N+Sg+Ter1`
* *marjalesai:* `marj+N+Sg+Ter2`
* *marjassai:* `marj+N+Sg+Ter3`
* *marjahopäi:* `marj+N+Sg+Add1`
* *marjalepäi:* `marj+N+Sg+Add2`

* *marjad:* `marj+N+Pl+Nom`
* *[marjoid'en,* `marjoiden]` (Eng. # checking needed: marj+N+Pl+Gen)
* *marjad:* `marj+N+Pl+Acc`
* *marjoid:* `marj+N+Pl+Par`
* *marjoikš:* `marj+N+Pl+Tra`
* *marjoita:* `marj+N+Pl+Abe`
* *marjoidenke:* `marj+N+Pl+Com`
* *marjoiš:* `marj+N+Pl+Ine`
* *marjoišpäi:* `marj+N+Pl+Ela`
* *marjoihe:* `marj+N+Pl+Ill`
* *marjoil:* `marj+N+Pl+Ade`
* *marjoilpäi:* `marj+N+Pl+Abl`
* *marjoile:* `marj+N+Pl+All`
* *marjoin:* `marj+N+Pl+EssInst`
* *marjoidme:* `marj+N+Pl+Prl`
* *marjoidenno:* `marj+N+Pl+Apr1`
* *marjoidennoks:* `marj+N+Pl+Apr2`
* *marjoidennopäi:* `marj+N+Pl+Egr`
* *marjoihesai:* `marj+N+Pl+Ter1`
* *marjoilesai:* `marj+N+Pl+Ter2`
* *marjoihepäi:* `marj+N+Pl+Add1`
* *marjoilepäi:* `marj+N+Pl+Add2`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *leib:* `leib+N+Sg+Nom`
* *leibän:* `leib+N+Sg+Gen`
* *leibid:* `leib+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *lind:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *lindun:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *linduid:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *heim:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *heimon:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *heimod:* `+N+Sg+Par`
* *heimoho:* `+N+Sg+Ill`
* *heimoid:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *poig:* `poig+N+Sg+Nom`
* *poigan:* `poig+N+Sg+Gen`
* *poigid:* `poig+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *kund:* `kund+N+Sg+Nom`
* *kundan:* `kund+N+Sg+Gen`
* *kundha:* `kund+N+Sg+Ill`
* *kundid:* `kund+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *uskond:* `uskond+N+Sg+Nom`
* *uskondan:* `uskond+N+Sg+Gen`
* *uskondaha:* `uskond+N+Sg+Ill`
* *uskondid:* `uskond+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *mezʼ:* `mezʼ+N+Sg+Nom`
* *mehen:* `mezʼ+N+Sg+Gen`
* *mehid:* `mezʼ+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *čai:* `čai+N+Sg+Nom`
* *čajun:* `čai+N+Sg+Gen`

Plural

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *ištim:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *ištmen:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *ištint:* `+N+Sg+Par`
* *ištmid:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *südäin:* `südäin+N+Sg+Nom`
* *südäimen:* `südäin+N+Sg+Gen`
* *südänt:* `südäin+N+Sg+Par`
* *südäid:* `südäin+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *kacui:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *kacujan:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *kacujid:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *oiged:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *oiktan:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *oiktoid:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *ikun:* `ikun+N+Sg+Nom`
* *iknan:* `ikun+N+Sg+Gen`
* *iknoid:* `ikun+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *tütär:* `tütär+N+Sg+Nom`
* *tütren:* `tütär+N+Sg+Gen`
* *tütrid:* `tütär+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *samal:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *samlon:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *samloid:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *papʼ:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *papin:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *papid:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *apʼ:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *apen:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *apid:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *vilʼlʼ:* `vilʼlʼ+N+Sg+Nom`
* *villän:* `vilʼlʼ+N+Sg+Gen`
* *villid:* `vilʼlʼ+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *golʼlʼ:* `golʼlʼ+N+Sg+Nom`
* *golʼlʼan:* `golʼlʼ+N+Sg+Gen`
* *gollid:* `golʼlʼ+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *grähk:* `grähk+N+Sg+Nom`
* *grähkän:* `grähk+N+Sg+Gen`
* *grähkid:* `grähk+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *lapsʼ:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *lapsen:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *last:* `+N+Sg+Par`
* *lapsed:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *noruzʼ:* `noruzʼ+N+Sg+Nom`
* *noruden:* `noruzʼ+N+Sg+Gen`
* *norut:* `noruzʼ+N+Sg+Par`
* *noruzid:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *velʼlʼ:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *vellen:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *vellid:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *n:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

* Noun ' / ' examples:*
* *:* `+N+Sg+Nom`
* *an:* `+N+Sg+Gen`
* *d:* `+N+Pl+Par`

LEXICON N_NADO  nado:nado

* Noun ' wife's sister-in-law/ ' examples:*
* *nado:* `nado+N+Sg+Nom`
* *nadon:* `nado+N+Sg+Gen`
* *nadod:* `nado+N+Sg+Par`
* *nadoho:* `nado+N+Sg+Ill`
* *nadoid:* `nado+N+Pl+Par`

## Nominals

* SG-NOM-SUF ;  rusked:

# ACTUAL CASES 

# Start Plural

# Possessor Indices

Not yet written...

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-vep/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc)</small>
